Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.............................  $ 143,486,686
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf .. $ 17,323,780
SECTION 2. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the following amounts, which are to be dis-
tributed as grants-in-aid, for program costs and to purchase  services, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Early intervention services
and early childhood special
education programs .............. $ 250,201,917
(2) Other K-12 grant-in-aid
programs............................... $ 136,515,914
(3) Youth development
programs............................... $ 18,573,513
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding ORS 327.856, there is appropriated to the  Department of
Education, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$138,927,716 for deposit into the High School Graduation and College and  Career Readiness
Fund.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to  the Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $78,578,573 for debt service
on general obligation bonds.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$70,828,864 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund for deposit in the School Capital Matching Fund established under
ORS 286A.806 as described in section 4, Article XI-P, of the Oregon Constitution.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$8,693,643 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for debt service.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses, other than expenses described in sections 8 and 16 of this 2025  Act, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds,
corporate activity tax funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital bonding..................... $ 202,415,961
(2) Operations............................. $ 59,906,260
(3) Oregon School for the Deaf .. $ 7,513,371
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from fees, moneys or  other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds,  corporate activity tax funds
and federal funds,  collected or received by the Department of Education for programs other
than those specified in sections 7 and 16 of this 2025 Act, for the following purposes:
(1) Youth development
programs............................... $ 6,874,100
(2) All other grants .................... $ 244,853,746
(3) Educator Advancement
Council.................................. $ 45,781,848
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds, other than those described in sections 10 and 16 of this 2025
Act, collected or received by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations............................. $ 82,151,893
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf .. $ 516,066
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of grants-in-aid,  program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than those
described in sections 9 and 16 of this  2025 Act, received by the Department of Education, for
the following purposes:
(1) Youth development
programs............................... $ 1,362,829
(2) All other grants .................... $ 955,358,992
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,109,828,482 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit
for payments of grants-in-aid, program  costs and purchased services by the Department of
Education from the Student Investment Account established under ORS 327.175.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$122,643,007 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department of Ed-
ucation from the Early Learning Account established under ORS 327.269,  for early inter-
vention services and early childhood special education programs.
SECTION 13.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$427,741,593 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education for a  transfer of corporate activities
tax funds from the  Early Learning Account established under ORS 327.269 to the Department
of Early Learning and Care.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 2
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payments
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services  by the Department of Education from
the Statewide Education Initiatives Account  established under ORS 327.250, for the following
purposes:
(1) High School Graduation
and College and Career
Readiness Fund..................... $ 199,151,203
(2) Reengagement program ........ $ 9,059,615
(3) All other grants .................... $ 349,727,083
SECTION 15.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$71,773,110 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from the Statewide Education  Initi-
atives Account established under ORS 327.250 for operations.
SECTION 16. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, the following expenditures by the
Department of Education are not limited:
(1) Moneys  from the School Foods Revolving Account, Education Training Revolving Ac-
count and Common School Fund; and
(2) Expenditures for grants-in-aid and purchased services from federal funds received  by
the Department of Education from the United States Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 17. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 3